Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2414.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-3006, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-3006. Divulging communication service information; classification A person is guilty of a class 6 felony who either: 1. Intentionally and without lawful authority obtains any knowledge of the contents of a wire or electronic communication by connivance with a communication service provider or its officer or employee. 2. Is a communications communication service provider,  or officer or employee of a communications communication service provider and intentionally divulges to anyone but the person for whom it was intended, except with the permission of the sender or the person for whom it was intended or in any case covered by the exemption in section 13-3012, the contents or the nature of a wire or electronic communication entrusted to the communications communication service provider for transmission or delivery. END_STATUTE